Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Two Million Eight Hundred Thousand Dollars
($2,800,000.00) appropriated from the Statewide Recovery Fund
created in Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the

Department of Human Services by Section 2 of Enrolled House Bill No.
2884 of the 1st Regular Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature, to
provide semi-independent housing, food security, and transitional
tools to victims of domestic violence, the sum of One Million Five
Hundred Sixty Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-five Dollars
($1,560,875.00) shall be transferred to the Statewide Recovery Fund
for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be consistent with the
recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief
Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Twelve Million Eight Hundred Two Thousand Nine Hundred
Ninety-three Dollars ($12,802,993.00) appropriated from the
Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, to the Department of Human Services by Section 1
of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1186 of the 1st Regular Session of the
59th Oklahoma Legislature to establish a grant program that provides
assistance to food programs which support the availability of and
access to affordable and nutritious foods, the sum of One Hundred
Sixty-two Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-eight Dollars and eighty-five
cents ($162,668.85) shall be transferred to the Statewide Recovery
Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be consistent with
the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Four Million Five Hundred Thirty-seven Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($4,537,500.00) appropriated from the Statewide
Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, to the Health Care Workforce Development Revolving Fund by
Section 7 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1458 of the 2nd Regular
Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature to establish a grant
program with Care Providers Oklahoma for the purpose of recruiting,
educating, and stabilizing Oklahoma's health care workforce, the sum
of One Million Four Hundred Ninety Thousand Six Hundred Seventy-five
Dollars and eight cents ($1,490,675.08) shall be transferred to the
Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2788 Page 2

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) appropriated from
the Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Oklahoma State University Medical
Authority by Section 3 of Enrolled House Bill No. 1012 of the 2nd
Extraordinary Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature to fund
outreach, training, and other allowable expenses associated with the
implementation of a rural advanced care pilot program, the sum of
Two Million One Hundred Sixty-four Thousand Thirty-nine Dollars
($2,164,039.00) shall be transferred to the Statewide Recovery Fund
for reappropriation. Such transfer shall be consistent with the
recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief
Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) appropriated
from the Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62
of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the State Department of Health by
Section 3 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 20 of the 2nd Extraordinary
Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature for a program providing
medical facilities for disproportionately impacted populations, the
sum of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) shall be transferred to
the Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer
shall be consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint
Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Eighty-seven Million Dollars ($87,000,000.00)
appropriated from the Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255
of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Department of Mental
Health and Substance Abuse Services by Section 1 of Enrolled House
Bill No. 1013 of the 2nd Extraordinary Session of the 58th Oklahoma
Legislature for addressing the ongoing increased demand for mental
health services by constructing a replacement facility for Griffin
Memorial Hospital; provided, that such construction be confined
within a thirty-mile radius of the State Capitol Building, the sum
of Twenty Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($20,500,000.00)
shall be transferred to the Statewide Recovery Fund for
reappropriation. Such transfer shall be consistent with the
ENR. H. B. NO. 2788 Page 3

recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief
Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) appropriated from
the Statewide Recovery Fund created in Section 255 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, to the Oklahoma Water Resources Board by
Section 9 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 13 of the 2nd Extraordinary
Session of the 58th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Three Million
Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,300,000.00) shall be transferred
to the Statewide Recovery Fund for reappropriation. Such transfer
shall be consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint
Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding on May 12, 2025.
SECTION 8. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2788 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2788 Page 5